Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 4. Robbery and Blackmail

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use of force or intimidation in retaining property or in attempting to escape, rather than in taking property, as element of robbery, 93 ALR3d 643.

§ 6-2-401.
Robbery; aggravated robbery; penalties.

A person is guilty of robbery if in the course of committing a crime defined by W.S.

6-3-402

, he:

Inflicts bodily injury upon another; or

Threatens another with or intentionally puts him in fear of immediate bodily injury.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, robbery is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

Aggravated robbery is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty-five (25) years if in the course of committing the crime of robbery the person:

Intentionally inflicts or attempts to inflict serious bodily injury; or

Uses or exhibits a deadly weapon or a simulated deadly weapon.

As used in this section “in the course of committing the crime” includes the time during which an attempt to commit the crime or in which flight after the attempt or commission occurred.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “6-3-412 or

6-3-413

” in (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “W.S.

6-3-402

, he” for “W.S.

6-3-402

,

6-3-412

or

6-3-413

he.”

At common law robbery was defined

as the felonious and forcible taking from the person of another of goods by violence or by putting in fear. McGinnis v. State, 16 Wyo. 72, 91 P. 936,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1907), overruled, Elliott v. State, 47 Wyo. 36, 30 P.2d 791,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1931).

Actual fear of victim need not be shown. —

Although placing the victim in fear is one of the essential elements of robbery, actual fear need not be shown. Daellenbach v. State, 562 P.2d 679,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1977).

Degree of force used immaterial. —

The degree of force used by a person committing a robbery is immaterial, so long as it is sufficient to compel the victim to part with his property. Daellenbach v. State, 562 P.2d 679,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1977).

Assault, battery and reckless endangering not lesser included offenses. —

According to the strict test of “element identity” in Balsley v. State, 668 P.2d 1324,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1983), simple assault, battery, and reckless endangering are not lesser included offenses of the crimes of aggravated robbery or kidnapping. Amin v. State, 694 P.2d 119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1985).

Instruction on lesser included offense not given where no supporting evidence. —

Although larceny and robbery may be lesser included offenses of aggravated robbery, an instruction on a lesser included offense need not be given where there is no evidence to support a verdict other than guilty or not guilty of the greater offense. Amin v. State, 694 P.2d 119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1985).

Sufficiency of evidence. —

The evidence was insufficient to show that the defendant took a motel's property by threatening a desk clerk with immediate bodily harm or by intentionally putting her in fear of immediate bodily injury, where the defendant made no demand for money, uttered no words conveying a threat of bodily harm, made no physical gestures conveying a threat of bodily harm, displayed no weapon and made no attempt to disguise or conceal his facial features. Goodwine v. State, 764 P.2d 680,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1988).

Defendant's conviction for aggravated robbery, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-401(c), was supported by the evidence because the reasonable inference was that defendant, intentionally and with premeditation, demanded money from the victim at a party, shot and killed the victim, then took the money from the victim's pocket or off the floor, and fled; this was done in the presence of eye witnesses.
Jones v. State, 2012 WY 82, 278 P.3d 729,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of conspiracy to commit aggravated burglary, aggravated robbery, and aggravated assault and battery as the State presented evidence that defendant and the accomplice agreed to use the gun during the incident at the golf course because the golf course’s manager testified that after he hit defendant in the head with the flashlight, defendant turned and ran away; the manager then heard someone saying to shoot him; seconds later, the manager heard a gunshot and saw a muzzle flash; and it was reasonable for the jury to infer that the accomplice would have only said to shoot the manager if he knew defendant had a gun in his possession. Jordin v. State, 2018 WY 64, 419 P.3d 527,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2018).

Sufficient evidence for conviction of conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery. —

See Porth v. State, 868 P.2d 236,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1994).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery where five coconspirators and/or accomplices testified that defendant was the leader of the plan to rob the bank and did most of the talking during the planning discussions. Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Other bad acts evidence. —

Because Wyo. R. Evid. 404(b) prohibited evidence of other crimes or wrongs in order to show that defendant acted in conformity therewith, the trial court did not err in admitting evidence that defendant was behind in his child support payments at defendant's trial on charges of sexual assault and robbery because it was not the kind of evidence that would naturally lead the jury to believe that he would commit a sexual assault and robbery. Even if the evidence was 404(b) evidence, however, it was properly admissible to establish defendant's motive for the robbery.
Schreibvogel v. State, 2010 WY 45, 228 P.3d 874,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2010).

Sentence upheld. —

A four-to-six year sentence was proper where (1) a coperpetrator invited the victim back to her home and then told the victim that he would have to pay for her time, and (2) when the victim attempted to leave, the defendant took the victim's wallet and removed $ 200 in twenty-dollar bills from it and then struck the victim in the face, knocking him to the floor; the sentence was less than the maximum of 10 years allowable by law and was proper in light of the defendant's significant criminal history along with the role he played in the crime at issue. Mack v. State, 7 P.3d 899,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2000).

Duress defense. —

Defendant
was denied his right to a fair trial when the district court refused
to give the jury an instruction on the defense of duress after defendant
testified and admitted the elements of the crime of aiding and abetting
aggravated robbery where he was unarmed and alone in a different
town
with a man whom he had seen behave violently, who was armed
with a
gun, and who a week earlier had held the gun to his head and
threatened
his family if he did not do what he was told. The court
did not agree
that a reasonable alternative on the night of the robbery
was to walk
away. James v. State, 2015 WY 83, 2015 WY 83A, 357 P.3d 101,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2015).

Exclusion of alibi testimony was harmless error. —

Where defendant made inculpatory statements to the police on two occasions indicating that he had been present during the robbery, the error in excluding possible alibi testimony was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt. Lawson v. State, 994 P.2d 943,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. Feb. 8, 2000).

Separate sentences for aggravated assault and aggravated robbery. —

Aggravated assault and aggravated robbery each require an element not necessary to the other, and one may commit two separate and distinct crimes by threateningly pointing a pistol at someone and exhibiting that same pistol to facilitate a robbery; separate sentences for appellant's separate crimes were therefore permissible. Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Punishment for felony murder and underlying felony unconstitutional. —

The imposition of multiple punishments for felony murder and the underlying felony violates the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Cook v. State, 841 P.2d 1345,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1992).

Crimes not required to be merged for sentencing. —

Where appellant pointed pistol at victims and exhibited shotgun in course of kidnapping victims and appropriating their truck and trailer rig, crimes of aggravated assault and battery, aggravated robbery, and kidnapping were not required to be merged for sentencing purposes. Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Under the Blockburger analysis, first-degree premeditated murder requires proof of premeditated malice, while aggravated robbery does not require proof of malice, and the jury expressly found defendant guilty of first-degree premeditated murder and aggravated robbery; therefore, merger of the sentence to life imprisonment on defendant's first-degree murder conviction and the sentence to a term of years on defendant's aggravated robbery conviction was not required. Sincock v. State, 2003 WY 115, 76 P.3d 323,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2003).

Prior forgery conviction admissible. —

Defendant's convictions for robbery and misdemeanor credit card fraud in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-401(a)(i) and 63-802(a)(i) and (b)(iii) were appropriate because defendant's prior forgery conviction was admissible under Wyo. R. Evid. 404(b) to show that his use of the credit card was intentional and not the result of mistake or accident. The prior crime was also committed less than a year before the instant crime and defendant intended to deny any knowledge that the credit card was stolen or that he was otherwise involved in any of the crimes for which he was charged.
Temen v. State, 2009 WY 25, 201 P.3d 1139,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2009).

Instruction on defense of duress. —

In a conviction
for accessory before the fact to aggravated robbery, the district
court denied defendant his right to due process in not giving a jury
instruction on duress because defendant testified that a week before
the robbery, after he told co-defendant he wanted nothing to do with
him, co-defendant held a gun to his head and told him that he would
do what co-defendant wanted him to do or co-defendant would harm
his
family; after driving to an unknown location in Laramie rather
than
to the liquor store as he had said, co-defendant retrieved a
gun,
told defendant to follow his lead, and robbed a hotel; and,
by the
time the court ruled that it would not give the duress instruction,
defendant had admitted the elements of the crime. James v. State, 2015 WY 83, 351 P.3d 279,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo.), op. withdrawn, sub. op., 2015 WY 83, 357 P.3d 101,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Hukoveh v. Alston, 25 Wyo. 122, 165 P. 988,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1917); Johnson v. State, 562 P.2d 1294,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1977); Cloman v. State, 574 P.2d 410,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1978); Burns v. State, 574 P.2d 422,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 264

(Wyo. 1978); McCarty v. State, 616 P.2d 782,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1980); Aragon v. State, 627 P.2d 599,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1981); Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983); Oakley v. State, 715 P.2d 1374,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1986); Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991); Darrow v. State, 824 P.2d 1269,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1992); Reilly v. State, 2002 WY 156, 55 P.3d 1259,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2002); Broussard v. State, 2017 WY 73, 396 P.3d 1016,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Otte v. State, 563 P.2d 1361,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1977); Campbell v. State, 589 P.2d 358,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1979); Cook v. State, 631 P.2d 5,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1981); Alberts v. State, 642 P.2d 447,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1982); Naugher v. State, 685 P.2d 37,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1984); Engberg v. State, 686 P.2d 541,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1984); Williams v. State, 692 P.2d 233,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1984); Jones v. State, 735 P.2d 699,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 440

(Wyo. 1987); Schultz v. State, 751 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1988); Justice v. State, 775 P.2d 1002,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1989); Price v. State, 807 P.2d 909,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1991); Burk v. State, 848 P.2d 225,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Irvin v. State, 584 P.2d 1068,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Miller v. State, 508 P.2d 1207,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1973); Johnson v. State, 592 P.2d 285,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo.); Hubbard v. State, 618 P.2d 553,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1980); Lee v. State, 653 P.2d 1388,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 409

(Wyo. 1982); Duffy v. State, 837 P.2d 1047,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1992); Smith v. State, 880 P.2d 573,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1994); Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995); Wilkening v. State, 922 P.2d 1381,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1996); Major v. State, 2004 WY 4, 83 P.3d 468,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of evidence of other robberies, 42 ALR2d 854.

Robbery as affected by intent to collect or secure debt or claim, 46 ALR2d 1227.

Gambling or lottery paraphernalia as subject of robbery, 51 ALR2d 1396.

Robbery by means of toy or simulated gun or pistol, 61 ALR2d 996.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility for robbery, 79 ALR2d 1412.

Stolen money or property as subject of robbery, 89 ALR2d 1435.

Purse snatching as robbery or theft, 42 ALR3d 1381.

Prosecution for robbery of one person as bar to subsequent prosecution for robbery of another committed at the same time, 51 ALR3d 693.

What constitutes “exclusive possession” of stolen goods to support inference of robbery, 51 ALR3d 727.

Retaking of money lost at gambling as robbery or larceny, 75 ALR3d 1000.

Robbery by means of toy or simulated gun or pistol, 81 ALR3d 1006.

Robbery, attempted robbery, or assault to commit robbery, as affected by intent to collect or secure debt or claim, 88 ALR3d 1309.

Pocket or clasp knife as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statute aggravating offenses such as assault, robbery, or homicide, 100 ALR3d 287.

Coercion, compulsion, or duress as defense to charge of robbery, larceny, or related crime, 1 ALR4th 481.

Walking cane as deadly or dangerous weapon for purpose of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 8 ALR4th 842.

Parts of the human body, other than feet, as deadly or dangerous weapons for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses, 8 ALR4th 1268.

Fact that gun was unloaded as affecting criminal responsibility, 68 ALR4th 507.

Admissibility of expert opinion stating whether a particular knife was, or could have been, the weapon used in a crime, 83 ALR4th 660.

Dog as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 124 ALR5th 657.

Robbery: Identification of victim as person named in indictment or information, 4 ALR6th 577.

Cigarette lighter as deadly or dangerous weapon, 22 ALR6th 533.

“Intimidation” as element of bank robbery under 18 U.S.C. § 2113(a), 163 ALRFed 225.

§ 6-2-402.
Blackmail; aggravated blackmail; penalties.

A person commits blackmail if, with the intent to obtain property of another or to compel action or inaction by any person against his will, the person:

Threatens bodily injury or injury to the property of another person; or

Accuses or threatens to accuse a person of a crime or immoral conduct which would tend to degrade or disgrace the person or subject him to the ridicule or contempt of society.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, blackmail is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

A person commits aggravated blackmail, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty-five (25) years if in the course of committing the crime of blackmail the person causes bodily injury to another person.

As used in this section “in the course of committing the crime” includes the time during which an attempt to commit the crime or in which flight after the attempt or commission occurred.

Conduct denoted blackmail in this section constitutes a single offense embracing the separate crimes formerly known as blackmail and extortion.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to intimidation of an election official or elector, see §

22-26-111

.

Communication of threat to intended victim is necessary element

of the crime of blackmail under this section. Otte v. State, 563 P.2d 1361,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1977).

Such threat need not be communicated directly. —

The threat involved in the crime of blackmail need not be communicated directly; it can be communicated by any number of third persons so long as it is given and received as a threat. Otte v. State, 563 P.2d 1361,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1977).

But threat must strike fear in ordinary man. —

A threat must be made in such circumstances as would be expected to strike fear in the heart of the ordinary man or woman. Otte v. State, 563 P.2d 1361,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1977).

Debts cannot be collected by duress or threat of imprisonment.

United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Cook, 43 Wyo. 356, 5 P.2d 294,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1931).

RICO claim. —

Where plaintiff landowner accused defendant Bureau of Land Management officials of harassment and intimidation aimed at extracting an easement, and filed a claim under 18 U.S.C.S. § 1962(c), 1964(c), of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO), alleging Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-402

extortion as the predicate offense, the claim failed because the Wyoming blackmail statute could not qualify as a predicate offense, as it could not be generically classified as extortionate and the conduct alleged did not fit the traditional definition of extortion. Wilkie v. Robbins, 551 U.S. 537, 127 S. Ct. 2588, 168 L. Ed. 2d 389, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 8513 (U.S. 2007).

Cited

in

Coleman v. State, 741 P.2d 99,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1987); Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of corporation for extortion, 49 ALR3d 820.

What constitutes “property” obtained within extortion statute, 67 ALR3d 1021.

What constitutes taking of money or other thing of value under color of office, 70 ALR3d 1153.

Truth as defense to state charge of criminal intimidation, extortion, blackmail, threats and the like, based upon threats to disclose information about victim, 39 ALR4th 1011.

As to courts generally, see title 5.

When is act of extortion performed “under color of official right” so as to be in violation of Hobbs Act (18 USCS § 1951), 74 ALR Fed 199.

Construction and application of § 2C1.1 of United States Sentencing Guidelines (18 USC APPX § 2C1.1) pertaining to offenses involving public officials offering, giving, soliciting, or receiving bribes, or extortion under color of official right, 144 ALR Fed 615.

§ 6-2-403.
Intimidation in furtherance of the interests of a criminal street gang.

A person is guilty of intimidation in furtherance of the interests of a criminal street gang if he threatens or intimidates by word or conduct to cause physical injury to another person or damage to the property of another in order to promote, further or assist in the interests of or to cause, induce or solicit another person to participate in a criminal street gang.

Intimidation in furtherance of the interests of a criminal street gang is a high misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one (1) year, a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 42, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Evidence held sufficient. —

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's conviction for six counts of receiving stolen property under this section because she received funds from an unauthorized account based on checks issued by her mother.
Remmick v. State, 2012 WY 57, 275 P.3d 467,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2012).